Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2461YC (1) 91 as/js H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 UNAUTHORIZED USE OF PUBLIC LAND 2 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 716.15 Unauthorized use of public 3 land. 4 1. A person shall not use public property for unauthorized 5 sleeping, camping, or long-term shelter. If an individual 6 knowingly violates this subsection, the individual shall be 7 issued a warning and offered services or shelter. If the 8 individual refuses to vacate the public property after being 9 issued a warning, the individual commits a simple misdemeanor. 10 2. a. A political subdivision shall not adopt or enforce 11 any policy under which the political subdivision directly or 12 indirectly prohibits or discourages the enforcement of any 13 order or ordinance prohibiting unauthorized sleeping, camping, 14 or long-term shelter on public property, or obstruction of 15 public rights-of-way, including roads and sidewalks. 16 b. A political subdivision shall not directly or indirectly 17 prohibit or discourage a peace officer or prosecuting attorney 18 who is employed by, or otherwise under the direction or control 19 of, the political subdivision from enforcing any order or 20 ordinance prohibiting unauthorized sleeping, camping, or 21 long-term shelter on public property or obstruction of public 22 rights-of-way, including roads and sidewalks. 23 3. This section shall not prohibit a policy of any political 24 subdivision that encourages diversion programs or offers 25 services in lieu of citation or arrest. 26 4. a. The attorney general may bring a civil action in 27 any court of competent jurisdiction against any political 28 subdivision to enjoin the political subdivision from violating 29 this section. 30 b. The attorney general may recover reasonable expenses 31 incurred in any civil action brought under this section, 32 including court costs, reasonable attorney fees, investigative 33 costs, witness fees, and deposition costs. 34 DIVISION II 35 -1- LSB 2461YC (1) 91 as/js 1/ 16 H.F. _____ PUBLIC CAMPING ââ COUNTIES AND CITIES 1 Sec. 2. Section 331.301, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 2 following new subsection: 3 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. a. A county may adopt or enforce 4 an ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment designating 5 portions of public property within its jurisdiction, for 6 periods not to exceed one year, to be used for public camping 7 by persons experiencing unsheltered homelessness. Such an 8 ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment shall include the 9 following standards and requirements: 10 (1) A list of residents must be kept identifying the names 11 and dates of persons using the public camping location. 12 (2) Specific sublots, parking spots, or other designated 13 areas must be assigned to each person or family. 14 (3) Property and personal safety and security measures 15 shall be established. 16 (4) Sanitization measures shall be established including 17 providing residents, at a minimum, clean and running water, 18 restrooms, and a location to shower. 19 (5) Access shall be provided to regionally available 20 services such as behavioral health, substance abuse, and mental 21 health treatment. 22 (6) Alcoholic beverages and all illegal substances shall be 23 banned from the public camping location. 24 (7) All other federal, state, and local laws, ordinances, 25 and resolutions are applicable and shall be enforced. 26 b. The attorney general, or a resident or a business 27 owner of the county, may seek an injunction to enforce 28 the requirements of this subsection or may initiate other 29 proceedings in district court. If the resident or business 30 owner prevails, the court may award reasonable expenses to be 31 paid by the county including but not limited to court costs, 32 attorney fees, and any and all costs associated with the 33 proceedings. Prior to seeking an injunction, the resident or 34 business owner shall provide written notice to the county that 35 -2- LSB 2461YC (1) 91 as/js 2/ 16 H.F. _____ an alleged violation of paragraph âaâ has occurred and allow the 1 county at least five business days to cure the violation. 2 c. This subsection is not applicable to any other type 3 of camping or campgrounds authorized under local, state, or 4 federal laws and regulations. Nothing in this subsection 5 shall be construed to restrict the state nor any county from 6 authorizing, maintaining, or allowing temporary camping on a 7 public or private campsite. 8 d. For purposes of this subsection: 9 (1) âCampsiteâ means a location on public or private 10 grounds designated for recreational overnight use for limited 11 durations. 12 (2) âPublic campingâ means sleeping, occupying, or otherwise 13 using public property as a substitute for a shelter. 14 (3) âUnsheltered homelessnessâ means the state of using 15 private or public property as a nontraditional primary 16 residence. Areas and objects that are traditionally not used 17 as a primary residence include but are not limited to vehicles, 18 public parks, abandoned buildings, bus or train stations, and 19 airport property. 20 Sec. 3. Section 364.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 21 following new subsection: 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. a. A city may adopt or enforce an 23 ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment designating 24 portions of public property within its jurisdiction, for 25 periods not to exceed one year, to be used for public camping 26 by persons experiencing unsheltered homelessness. Such an 27 ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment shall include the 28 following standards and requirements: 29 (1) A list of residents must be kept identifying the names 30 and dates of persons using the public camping location. 31 (2) Specific sublots, parking spots, or other designated 32 areas must be assigned to each person or family. 33 (3) Property and personal safety and security measures 34 shall be established. 35 -3- LSB 2461YC (1) 91 as/js 3/ 16 H.F. _____ (4) Sanitization measures shall be established including 1 providing residents, at a minimum, clean and running water, 2 restrooms, and a location to shower. 3 (5) Access shall be provided to regionally available 4 services such as behavioral health, substance abuse, and mental 5 health treatment. 6 (6) Alcoholic beverages and all illegal substances shall be 7 banned from the public camping location. 8 (7) All other federal, state, and local laws, ordinances, 9 and resolutions are applicable and shall be enforced. 10 b. The attorney general, or a resident or a business owner 11 of the city, may seek an injunction to enforce the requirements 12 of this subsection or may initiate other proceedings in 13 district court. If the resident or business owner prevails, 14 the court may award reasonable expenses to be paid by the city 15 including but not limited to court costs, attorney fees, and 16 any and all costs associated with the proceedings. Prior to 17 seeking an injunction, the resident or business owner shall 18 provide written notice to the city that an alleged violation 19 of paragraph âaâ has occurred and allow the city at least five 20 business days to cure the violation. 21 c. This subsection is not applicable to any other type 22 of camping or campgrounds authorized under local, state, or 23 federal laws and regulations. Nothing in this subsection 24 shall be construed to restrict the state nor any city from 25 authorizing, maintaining, or allowing temporary camping on a 26 public or private campsite. 27 d. For purposes of this subsection: 28 (1) âCampsiteâ means a location on public or private 29 grounds designated for recreational overnight use for limited 30 durations. 31 (2) âPublic campingâ means sleeping, occupying, or otherwise 32 using public property as a substitute for a shelter. 33 (3) âUnsheltered homelessnessâ means the state of using 34 private or public property as a nontraditional primary 35 -4- LSB 2461YC (1) 91 as/js 4/ 16 H.F. _____ residence. Areas and objects that are traditionally not used 1 as a primary residence include but are not limited to vehicles, 2 public parks, abandoned buildings, bus or train stations, and 3 airport property. 4 DIVISION III 5 DRUG-FREE HOMELESS SERVICE ZONES 6 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 716.16 Drug-free homeless service 7 zones. 8 1. A person commits a violation of this section if the 9 person intentionally or knowingly does any of the following: 10 a. The person is present within a drug-free homeless service 11 zone and sells or transfers or attempts to sell or transfer a 12 controlled substance. 13 b. The person operates or has authority to enforce the 14 policies and requirements of a facility-based drug-free 15 homeless service zone that primarily serves homeless 16 individuals and that receives state, local, or federal funding, 17 and the person allows an individual accessing services to 18 possess or use a controlled substance on the premises of the 19 facility. 20 2. An offense under subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , is 21 punishable as the same class of criminal violation for which 22 the offense would be punishable under existing law had the 23 violation not occurred within a drug-free homeless service 24 zone, except that the presumptive, minimum, and maximum 25 sentence for the offense shall be increased by one year. 26 The additional sentence imposed under this subsection is in 27 addition to any enhanced punishment that may be applicable 28 under subsection 4. Notwithstanding any other law to the 29 contrary, a person convicted under this section is not eligible 30 for a deferred judgment, deferred or suspended sentence, 31 probation, or work release. 32 3. A person who violates subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , is 33 guilty of an aggravated misdemeanor. 34 4. An operator of a facility-based drug-free homeless 35 -5- LSB 2461YC (1) 91 as/js 5/ 16 H.F. _____ service zone who violates subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , is 1 ineligible to apply for homelessness assistance grants from the 2 state for a period of three years from the date of conviction. 3 5. In addition to any other penalty, a person convicted 4 of an offense under this title shall be punished by a fine of 5 not less than two thousand dollars or three times the value 6 as determined by the court of the drugs involved in or giving 7 rise to the offense, whichever is greater. No fine under 8 this subsection shall be suspended, in part or whole, for any 9 reason. 10 6. Each operator of a facility-based service that primarily 11 serve homeless individuals shall place and maintain permanently 12 affixed signs located in a conspicuous manner clearly visible 13 to the public at the main entrance of the facility that 14 identifies the building and its accompanying grounds as a 15 drug-free homeless service zone. Such signs shall be written 16 in both English and Spanish and in contrasting colors with 17 block letters at least one inch in height. 18 7. For the purposes of this section: 19 a. âDrug-free homeless service zoneâ means the area within 20 three hundred feet of the premises of a facility-based service. 21 b. âFacility-based serviceâ means any emergency or temporary 22 shelter, transitional housing provider, or permanent supportive 23 housing entity that receives government funding for the purpose 24 of providing shelter to homeless persons. 25 c. âOperatorâ means the sole proprietorship, organization, 26 association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited 27 partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability 28 company, or other entity or business association that is the 29 direct recipient of government funding for the provision of 30 facility-based services. 31 DIVISION IV 32 FUNDING FOR HOMELESS SHELTERS ââ ANNUAL REPORTS 33 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 16.5G Homelessness funding ââ annual 34 reports. 35 -6- LSB 2461YC (1) 91 as/js 6/ 16 H.F. _____ 1. As used in this section unless the context requires 1 otherwise: 2 a. âCoordinating entityâ means the state, any political 3 subdivision, or any continuum of care program as recognized by 4 the United States department of housing and urban development 5 and the collaborative applicant of the continuum of care 6 program. 7 b. âService providerâ means a nonprofit, nongovernmental 8 homeless service provider, including but not limited to a 9 homeless shelter, a homeless service or advocacy program, 10 or a tribal organization, coalition, or other nonprofit, 11 nongovernmental organization carrying out a community-based 12 homeless or housing program that has a documented history of 13 effective work concerning homelessness, or that receives state 14 or federal funding to address homelessness. 15 c. âType of serviceâ means an identifiable outcome expected 16 from the disbursement of moneys intended to address a specific 17 purpose in combating homelessness, including but not limited 18 to the provision of housing and emergency shelter, case 19 management, outreach and navigation efforts, job acquisition, 20 or behavioral health counseling. 21 2. A coordinating entity that received funding in the 22 immediately preceding fiscal year for the purpose of combating 23 homelessness shall annually report to the authority all of the 24 following: 25 a. A comprehensive overview of all of the following: 26 (1) The coordinating entityâs overall homelessness response 27 plan that prioritizes strategies intended to reduce the 28 number of unsheltered individuals and families, including the 29 overall measurable goal of the response plan and any specific 30 measurable outcomes to reduce the number of unsheltered people 31 and achieve such goal. 32 (2) The coordinating entityâs financial award process, 33 including the extent to which prior performance affects 34 financial awards and accountability and affects referrals to 35 -7- LSB 2461YC (1) 91 as/js 7/ 16 H.F. _____ service providers to ensure that individuals experiencing 1 homelessness who are in need of services receive appropriate 2 services. 3 (3) The coordinating entityâs efforts to avoid duplication 4 of services and method of reporting progress in attaining 5 positive outcomes for bed utilization, outreach and referral 6 activities, and participation in rehabilitative and employment 7 attainment programs. 8 (4) The coordinating entityâs tracking and management 9 system for financial awards, billing, and invoicing; estimating 10 the number of individuals and households experiencing 11 homelessness; determining the acuity levels of individuals 12 participating in homelessness assistance programs; and 13 coordinating shelter and permanent supportive housing 14 placement. 15 b. An overview of the homeless population served by the 16 coordinating entity including all of the following: 17 (1) The types of homelessness occurring in the region served 18 by the coordinating entity. 19 (2) The subpopulations of homeless individuals, including 20 but not limited to individuals who have recently been 21 incarcerated, are victims of domestic violence, have a 22 disability, are seriously mentally ill, are chronically 23 homeless, are experiencing substance use disorder, and other 24 pertinent characteristics of homelessness. 25 (3) The type of services provided by the coordinating 26 entity and made available for each subpopulation of individuals 27 experiencing homelessness. 28 (4) The types of housing and shelter provided and made 29 available by the coordinating entity for each subpopulation of 30 individuals experiencing homelessness. 31 (5) The number of distinct individuals served by the 32 coordinating entity during the immediately preceding fiscal 33 year. 34 (6) The number of beds and units of each shelter type 35 -8- LSB 2461YC (1) 91 as/js 8/ 16 H.F. _____ created or maintained by the coordinating entity in the 1 immediately preceding fiscal year. 2 (7) The number of beds and units of each shelter type 3 eliminated, if any, in the immediately preceding fiscal year by 4 each service provider. 5 (8) For each service provider, the number of individuals who 6 successfully transitioned from each of the following: 7 (a) Independent shelter. 8 (b) Permanent supportive housing. 9 (c) Market rate housing. 10 (d) Transitional housing. 11 (e) Other housing. 12 c. The total amount of funding received by the coordinating 13 entity for the purpose of combating homelessness, and for each 14 identified funding source, provide the following: 15 (1) The source of the funding. 16 (2) The recipients and subrecipients of the funding. 17 (3) The amount of funding received from each funding source. 18 (4) The type of services each funding source intended to 19 support with the moneys provided, if applicable. 20 (5) Any restrictions on the use of moneys received from each 21 funding source, if applicable. 22 d. All moneys disbursed for the purpose of combating 23 homelessness, including all of the following: 24 (1) The total moneys disbursed to each service provider and 25 the funding source. 26 (2) The total moneys disbursed to service providers, per 27 type of service, per funding source, and the total number of 28 individuals served by each service provider per type of service 29 during the immediately preceding fiscal year. 30 (3) The average cost per unit of service that was 31 successfully delivered. 32 e. The total funding disbursed for each subpopulation of 33 homeless individual, per type of service. 34 f. Ancillary funding provided for indirect homelessness 35 -9- LSB 2461YC (1) 91 as/js 9/ 16 H.F. _____ support efforts, including but not limited to all of the 1 following: 2 (1) Emergency room usage. 3 (2) Emergency service usage. 4 (3) Sanitation. 5 (4) Code enforcement. 6 (5) Mental health and substance use treatment. 7 3. Each service provider shall annually report to the 8 authority all of the following: 9 a. The service providerâs audit and related records as 10 required by 2 C.F.R. Â§200.501. 11 b. For service providers providing housing services, the 12 providerâs success rate helping homeless individuals achieve 13 independent shelter. 14 c. For service providers providing vocational services, the 15 providerâs success rate helping homeless individuals with job 16 acquisition. 17 d. For service providers providing mental and physical 18 health care, the providerâs success rate helping homeless 19 individuals reduce emergency room usage and increase management 20 or treatment of substance use disorder, as applicable. 21 e. For service providers providing mental and physical 22 health care, the providerâs success rate helping homeless 23 individuals reduce emergency room usage and increase management 24 or treatment of severe mental illness, as applicable. 25 f. For service providers providing emergency shelter and 26 service providers providing transitional housing, all of the 27 following: 28 (1) Retention rates per night per occupied bed. 29 (2) Occupancy rate based on total available capacity, on 30 average. 31 (3) Frequency and number of individuals denied shelter each 32 night. 33 (4) Cost of unit delivery, per night. 34 (5) Outcomes of individualâs exits from shelter, including 35 -10- LSB 2461YC (1) 91 as/js 10/ 16 H.F. _____ aggregate reason and individualâs new location. 1 (6) Efforts by a shelter and service provider to support 2 independent shelter, job acquisition, and management or 3 elimination of substance use disorders or severe mental 4 illnesses. 5 (7) Types of services provided or facilitated by a shelter 6 provider. 7 (8) Prevalence of violence. 8 (9) Prevalence of unintended death. 9 (10) Prevalence of mortality and morbidity. 10 g. For service providers providing safe haven and service 11 providers providing rapid rehousing, all of the following: 12 (1) Retention rates per night per occupied bed. 13 (2) Occupancy rate based on total available capacity, on 14 average. 15 (3) Cost of unit delivery, per night. 16 (4) Outcomes of individualsâ exits from shelter, including 17 aggregate reason and each individualâs new location. 18 (5) Efforts by a shelter and service provider to support 19 independent shelter, job acquisition, and management or 20 elimination of substance use disorders or severe mental 21 illnesses. 22 (6) Types of services provided or facilitated by a shelter 23 provider. 24 (7) Prevalence of violence. 25 (8) Prevalence of unintended death. 26 (9) Prevalence of mortality and morbidity. 27 h. For service providers providing permanent supportive 28 housing, all of the following: 29 (1) Retention rates per month of service provided. 30 (2) Occupancy rate based on total available capacity, on 31 average. 32 (3) Cost of unit delivery, per month. 33 (4) Outcomes of individualsâ exits from shelter, including 34 aggregate reason and each individualâs new location. 35 -11- LSB 2461YC (1) 91 as/js 11/ 16 H.F. _____ (5) Efforts by a service provider to support independent 1 shelter, job acquisition, and management or elimination of 2 substance use disorders or severe mental illnesses. 3 (6) Types of service provided or facilitated by a shelter 4 provider. 5 (7) Prevalence of violence. 6 (8) Prevalence of unintended death. 7 (9) Prevalence of mortality and morbidity. 8 4. The authority shall make the reports submitted under this 9 section publicly available on the authorityâs internet site. 10